Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF BECKER; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in the city of Becker are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after May 31, 2024, and before May 1, 2025: new text end new text begin (1) a city hall; and new text end new text begin (2) to the extent materials, supplies, and equipment are not exempt under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.71, subdivision 53, a police station. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after May 31, 2024, and before May 1, 2025. new text end